Vermont, session 2025-2026, S4.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 19 V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. TOWN HIGHWAYS
§ 301. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(2) “Legislative body” includes boards of selectmen, aldermen, and
village trustees means a “legislative body” as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2001.
VT LEG #379228 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.4
2025 Page 2 of 4
(3) “Selectmen” includes village trustees and aldermen “Selectboard”
means a “selectboard” as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2001.
* * *
(8) “Trail” means a public right-of-way that is not a highway and that:
(A) municipalities have the authority to exclusively or cooperatively
maintain;
(B) previously was a designated town highway having the same
width as the designated town highway, or a lesser width if so designated; or
(B)(C) a new public right-of-way laid out as a trail by the selectmen
legislative body for the purpose of providing access to abutting properties or
for recreational use. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to independently
authorize the condemnation of land for recreational purposes or to affect the
authority of selectmen legislative bodies to reasonably regulate the uses of
recreational trails.
§ 302. CLASSIFICATION OF TOWN HIGHWAYS
(a) For the purposes of this section and receiving State aid, all town
highways shall be categorized into one or another of the following classes:
* * *
(2) Class 2 town highways are those town highways selected as the most
important highways in each town. As far as practicable, they shall be selected
with the purposes of securing trunk lines of improved highways from town to
VT LEG #379228 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.4
2025 Page 3 of 4
town and to places that by their nature have more than normal amount of
traffic. The selectmen legislative body, with the approval of the Agency, shall
determine which highways are to be class 2 highways.
(3) Class 3 town highways:
(A) Class 3 town highways are all traveled town highways other than
class 1 or 2 highways. The selectmen legislative body, after conference with a
representative of the Agency, shall determine which highways are class 3 town
highways.
* * *
(5) Trails shall not be considered highways and the town. A
municipality shall have the authority to maintain trails but shall not be
responsible for any maintenance, including culverts and bridges.
* * *
§ 303. TOWN HIGHWAY CONTROL
Town highways shall be under the general supervision and control of the
selectmen legislative body of the town where the roads are located. Selectmen
The legislative body of a town shall supervise all expenditures.
§ 304. DUTIES OF SELECTBOARD
(a) It shall be the duty and responsibility of the selectboard of the town to,
or acting as a board, it shall have the authority to:
* * *
VT LEG #379228 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.4
2025 Page 4 of 4
(16) Unless the town electorate votes otherwise, under the provisions of
17 V.S.A. § 2646, appoint a road commissioner, or remove him or her the road
commissioner from office, pursuant to 17 V.S.A. § 2651. Road
commissioners, elected or appointed, shall have only the powers and authority
regarding highways granted to them by the selectboard.
* * *
(24) Maintain trails, but shall not be required to maintain trails and shall
not owe a duty of care to persons using a trail that is maintained by the town.
* * *
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(31) Regulate by means of an ordinance the use of legal trails under
19 V.S.A. chapter 3, including the regulation of the types of vehicles that may
be used on legal trails.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379228 v.1